Utah statutes.
4-2-6.   Official seal -- Authentication of records.
The department shall adopt and use an official seal, a description and
impression of which shall be filed with the Division of Archives. Copies of
official department records, documents, and proceedings may be authenticated
with the seal attested by the commissioner.
